Spell/Test 1/german.aff
flag *Y:
# Past-tense ich/er/sie/es-form endings
    E [LR] N		>	-N,TE		# Wie lächeln	> lächelte
    [DTW] E N		>	-N,TE		#     arbeiten	> arbeitete
#    [^DIMNTW] E N	>	-EN,QQTE		#     leben	> lebte #qq schaff"|te
    [^DIMNTW] E N	>	-EN,TE		#     leben	> lebte #nn

    E I E N		>	-EN,TE		#     freien	> freite
    [^E] I E N		>	-N,TE		#     knien	> kniete

    C H N E N		>	-N,TE		# Wie rechnen	> rechnete
    [^C] H [MN] E N	>	-EN,TE		#     ahnen	> ahnte

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-N,TE		# Wie atmen	> atmete
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-EN,TE		# Wie lernen	> lernte

# Past-tense du-form endings
    E [LR] N		>	-N,TEST 	# Wie lächeln	> lächeltest
    [DTW] E N		>	-N,TEST 	#     arbeiten	> arbeitetest
#    [^DIMNTW] E N	>	-EN,QQTEST	#     leben	> lebtest #qq schaff"|test
    [^DIMNTW] E N	>	-EN,TEST	#     leben	> lebtest #nn

    E I E N		>	-EN,TEST	#     freien	> freitest
    [^E] I E N		>	-N,TEST 	#     knien	> knietest

    C H N E N		>	-N,TEST 	# Wie rechnen	> rechnetest
    [^C] H [MN] E N	>	-EN,TEST	#     ahnen	> ahntest

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-N,TEST 	# Wie atmen	> atmetest
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-EN,TEST	# Wie lernen	> lerntest

# Past-tense ihr-form endings
    E [LR] N		>	-N,TET		# Wie nähern	> nähertet
    [DTW] E N		>	-N,TET		#     rasten	> rastetet
#    [^DIMNTW] E N	>	-EN,QQTET 	#     rasen	> rastet #qq klopf"|tet
    [^DIMNTW] E N	>	-EN,TET 	#     rasen	> rastet #nn

    E I E N		>	-EN,TET 	#     freien	> freitet
    [^E] I E N		>	-N,TET		#     knien	> knietet

    C H N E N		>	-N,TET		# Wie rechnen	> rechnetet
    [^C] H [MN] E N	>	-EN,TET 	#     ahnen	> ahntet

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-N,TET		# Wie atmen	> atmetet
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-EN,TET 	# Wie lernen	> lerntet

# Past-tense sie/Sie-form endings
    E [LR] N		>	-N, TEN 	# Wie lächeln	> lächelten
    [DTW] E N		>	-N, TEN 	#     arbeiten	> arbeiteten
#    [^DIMNTW] E N	>	-EN,QQTEN 	#     leben	> lebten #qq hüpf"|ten
    [^DIMNTW] E N	>	-EN,TEN 	#     leben	> lebten #nn

    E I E N		>	-EN,TEN 	#     freien	> freiten
    [^E] I E N		>	-N,TEN		#     knien	> knieten

    C H N E N		>	-N, TEN 	# Wie rechnen	> rechneten
    [^C] H [MN] E N	>	-EN,TEN 	#     ahnen	> ahnten

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-N, TEN 	# Wie atmen	> atmeten
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-EN,TEN 	# Wie lernen	> lernten

# Past-tense endings for non-regular verbs and Konjunktiv forms from ich-form:
flag *Z:
# er/sie/es = ich
# du
    [^HsSSSSZ]		>	ST		# Wie wusste	> wusstest
    [^C] H		>	ST		#     floh	> flohest
    [^S] C H		>	ST	#     wich	> wichst
# CH,D,F,K and T may also have an 'e' before 'st':
    [DFKSTZ]		>	EST	#     riet	> rietest
# There are verbs which don't have the -chest form below, such as 'brachst'
# or 'rochst'.	Then use 'brachen/WX', which is only slightly less elegant.
    C H 		>	EST	#     wusch	> wuschest
    [AU] sS		>	EST	#     aß	> aßest #swiss-convert
    I E sS		>	EST	#     ließ	> ließt #swiss-convert
    [IO] SS		>	EST	#     goss	> gossest

# ihr
#    [^DT]		>	QQT	#     wüsste	> wüsstet #qq griff"|t
    [^DT]		>	T	#     wüsste	> wüsstet #nn
    [DT]		>	ET	#     riet	> rietet
#   If you insist on all past tense ihr-forms ending in -et,
#   here is how to do it:
#   [ I didn't check if this is 'normal' or not, but it seems somewhat
#     old-fashioned to me.  ]
#   .		>	ET		#     hob	> hobet
#						#     schoss	> schosset

# wir/sie
    E			>	N	#     hatte	> hatten
    I E 		>	EN	# auch: schrie	> schrieen
    [^E]		>	EN	#     nahm	> nahmen

flag *O:
#
# Partizip dekliniert: Wie  verarbeiten -> verarbeiteter
#
# This is similar to flag Y,  but will not necessaryly apply
# to all verbs which have regular (Y) past tense form.
#
# The forms to be generated are the same as for the A flag
# (which could be used with a different stem to do the same thing).
#
# flag *Y wil already produce the -e, -en forms.
#
# -tes
    E [LR] N		>	-N,TES		# Wie vererben	> vererbtes
    [DTW] E N		>	-N,TES
#    [^DMNTW] E N	>	-EN,QQTES	#qq
    [^DMNTW] E N	>	-EN,TES	#nn

    C H N E N		>	-N,TES
    [^C] H [MN] E N	>	-EN,TES

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N	>	-N,TES
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N	>	-EN,TES
# -ter						# Wie erzielen > erzielter
    E [LR] N		>	-N,TER
    [DTW] E N		>	-N,TER
#    [^DMNTW] E N	>	-EN,QQTER	#qq
    [^DMNTW] E N	>	-EN,TER	#nn

    C H N E N		>	-N,TER
    [^C] H [MN] E N	>	-EN,TER

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N	>	-N,TER
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N	>	-EN,TER
# -tem						# Wie verfluchen > verfluchtem
    E [LR] N		>	-N,TEM
    [DTW] E N		>	-N,TEM
#    [^DMNTW] E N	>	-EN,QQTEM	#qq
    [^DMNTW] E N	>	-EN,TEM	#nn

    C H N E N		>	-N,TEM
    [^C] H [MN] E N	>	-EN,TEM

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N	>	-N,TEM
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N	>	-EN,TEM
